New York, session 2025-2026, A6743.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Subdivision (e) of section 15 of chapter 329 of the laws of 2 1991, amending the state finance law and other laws relating to estab- 3 lishing the dedicated highway and bridge trust fund and the dedicated 4 mass transportation trust fund, as added by chapter 330 of the laws of 5 1991, is amended to read as follows: 6 (e) i. The service life of all projects funded pursuant to this 7 section shall be at least ten years. 8 ii. The ten year service life requirement of paragraph i of this 9 subdivision shall not apply to projects funded for painting, striping 10 and other new infrastructure dedicated primarily for pedestrian or 11 cyclist use. 12 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD04841-01-5